Washington statutes.
RCW 18.33.070

Data system.

(1) The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action, and the presence of significant investigative information on all licensees and applicants for a license in participating states.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a participating state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the commission, including:

(a) Identifying information;

(b) Licensure data;

(c) Adverse actions against a licensee, license applicant, or compact privilege and information related thereto;

(d) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation;

(e) Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law;

(f) The presence of significant investigative information; and

(g) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the commission.

(3) The records and information provided to a participating state pursuant to this compact or through the data system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a participating state.

(4) Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any participating state will only be available to other participating states.

(5) It is the responsibility of the participating states to monitor the database to determine whether adverse action has been taken against a licensee or license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or license applicant in any participating state will be available to any other participating state.

(6) Participating states contributing information to the data system may designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the participating state.

(7) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the participating state contributing the information shall be removed from the data system.

[ 2023 c 297 s 8.]